Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.210

Agent's bond.

Such agent shall make, subscribe and file an oath for the faithful performance of his or her duties, and shall give a bond to the state, to be approved by the court, conditioned faithfully to manage and account for such estate, before he or she shall be authorized to receive any property of said estate.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2073; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.210. Prior: 1955 ex.s. c 7 s 2; 1917 c 156 s 166; RRS s 1536.]